Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB80.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 6 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) Members of the General Assembly and members-elect of the General
Assembly who have received their certificates of election may prefile bills
and resolutions for introduction in the next succeeding regular legislative
session with the director of the Legislative Research Commission.
(b) Bills and resolutions which are prefiled pursuant to this section shall be in
the final and correct form for introduction in the General Assembly as
required by the Constitution of Kentucky, laws, and rules of the respective
houses of the Legislature.
(c) The original copy of every bill and resolution prefiled shall include
immediately below the typed or printed name of the sponsor of the bill or
resolution and the full signature of the sponsor.
(2) The director of the Legislative Research Commission shall:
(a) Receive prefiled bills and resolutions;
(b) Assign numbers for introduction in the proper house in order of receipt;
(c) Publish the prefiled bill or resolution on the Commission's website once it
has been assigned a number; and
(d) Subject to the provisions of subsection (4) of this section, deliver the
original and four (4) copies of each bill and resolution to the clerk of the
Senate or the clerk of the House of Representatives, as appropriate, on the
first day of the regular session.
(3) Prefiled bills and resolutions shall be considered as introduced on the day of their
delivery to each house.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, in the event a
Page 1 of 2
BR099300.100 - 993 - XXXX 1/7/2025 1:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 993
person sponsoring a prefiled bill or resolution ceases to be a member of the
General Assembly at the time of the convening of the next succeeding regular
legislative session, the prefiling of that bill or resolution shall be considered to be
without effect, and the director of the Legislative Research Commission shall not
deliver the original or copies to the clerk of the Senate or the clerk of the House
of Representatives.
(5) No limits shall be placed upon the number of bills that a member of the General
Assembly may prefile.
Page 2 of 2
BR099300.100 - 993 - XXXX 1/7/2025 1:34 PM Jacketed